Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-603.01
Electronic signatures; department; duty.

The department shall provide for an electronic means of receiving electronic signatures as provided in section 86-611 for purposes of filing and amending death and fetal death certificates under the Vital Statistics Act.

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 22.